Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 7 Regulation and Construction of Hospitals and Other Health Care Facilities

Cross references.

Authority of board of regents with regard to Eugene Talmadge Memorial Hospital, §

20-3-520

et seq.

Requirement of smoke detectors for nursing homes, §

25-2-40

.

Offering continuing care when resident purchases resident owned living unit, §

33-45-7.1

.

Designation of emergency receiving facilities for examination of mentally ill persons, alcoholics, and others, §§

37-3-40

et seq.,

37-7-40

et seq.

Designation of evaluating facilities for examination of persons ordered by court to undergo evaluation for mental illness, alcoholism, and other conditions, §§

37-3-60

,

37-7-60

.

Authority of Department of Veterans Service and Veterans Service Board to construct and operate hospitals, nursing homes, and other facilities for care of war veterans, §

38-4-2

.

Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses, T. 43, C. 26.

Physical therapists, T. 43, C. 33.

Physicians, osteopaths, T. 43, C. 34.

Administrative rules and regulations.

General licensing and enforcement requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-25.

Personal care homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-62.

Rules and regulations for residential mental health facilities for children and youth, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-68.

Rules and regulations for proxy caregivers used in licensed healthcare facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-100.

Law reviews.

For article, “Baby Doe Cases: Compromise and Moral Dilemma,” see 34 Emory L.J. 545 (1985).

For article, “State of Emergency: Why Georgia’s Standard of Care in Emergency Rooms is Harmful to Your Health,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (2010).

For article, “The Olmstead Decision: The Road to Dignity and Freedom,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (2010).

For article, “Olmstead’s Promise and Cohousing’s Potential,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 663 (2010).

For article, “From the Inside Out: Personal Perspectives of Six Georgians on Their Institutional Experiences,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 741 (2010).

For article, “The Constitutional Right to Community Services,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 763 (2010).

For article, “Reconsidering Makin v. Hawaii:
The Right of Medicaid Beneficiaries to Home-Based Services as an Alternative to Institutionalization,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 803 (2010).

For article, “The Potential and Risks of Relying on Title II’s Integration Mandate to Close Segregated Institutions,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 855 (2010).

For article, “Beyond Residential Segregation: The Application of Olmstead to Segregated Employment Settings,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 875 (2010).

For article, “From Almshouses to Nursing Homes and Community Care: Lessons from Medicaid’s History,” see 26 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 937 (2010).

For note, “Deinstitutionalization: Georgia’s Progress in Developing and Implementing an ‘Effectively Working Plan’ as Required by Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel,” see 25 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 699 (2009).

For note, “Bearing Hospital Tax Breaks:
How Nonprofits Benefit From Your Surprise Medical Bills,” see 35 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 809 (2019).